Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 3. Highway Safety Patrol
§ 45-3-53.
Distinctive marker on cemetery memorials for Highway Safety Patrol officers killed in line of duty; markers for other officers.

The Department of Public Safety shall place a distinctive marker on the cemetery memorial of each Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officer who is killed in the performance of his or her official duties. The distinctive marker shall be designed by the Department of Public Safety with the advice and recommendation of the Mississippi State Troopers’ Association.

The funding for the distinctive markers shall be made from any funds appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Public Safety or from any gifts, grants or donations received by the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of providing the distinctive markers.

This section shall apply to all Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officers who have given their lives in the performance of their official duties before and after July 1, 2000.

Any Highway Safety Patrol officer may secure a distinctive marker as authorized in subsection (1) of this section if it is paid for with funds other than funds appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Public Safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 502, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 45-3-55.
Mississippi Highway Patrol Troop “D” substation named “Robert ‘Bunky’ Huggins Substation.”

The Mississippi Highway Patrol Troop “D” substation located in the Greenwood, Mississippi, District, shall be named the “Robert ‘Bunky’ Huggins Substation.” The Department of Public Safety shall place a distinctive plaque in a prominent place within the building, which states the background, accomplishments and service of the late Senator Robert “Bunky” Huggins to the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 529, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2007.).

§ 45-3-57.
Mississippi Department of Public Safety’s Highway Patrol District Office designated “Charles L. Young, Sr., District Office.”

The Mississippi Department of Public Safety’s Highway Patrol District Office, located in Meridian, Lauderdale County, Mississippi, which serves as the command center for Troop H of the Mississippi Highway Patrol, shall be named the “Charles L. Young, Sr., District Office.” The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the building, that states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Charles L. Young, Sr. The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety’s Highway Patrol Division shall erect or cause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the outdoor facade of the building displaying the official name of the building as the “Charles L. Young, Sr., District Office.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 508, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2011.